California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(3) When a party fails to file any written testimony, witness list, or proposed exhibit for the rate hearing, or objections to the prefiled testimony, witnesses, or proposed exhibits for the rate hearing, within the time specified by the complete petition calendar, the late filing may be accepted if the administrative law judge determines that there was good cause for failure to file within the required time. For purposes of this section, “good cause” exists when a failure to file arises from an excusable mistake, surprise, excusable neglect, or reasonable reliance on the statement of the administrative law judge, or from fraud, misrepresentation, or other misconduct by a party participating in the
 proceeding.

(e) The administrative law judge shall set a date in the complete petition calendar for the parties to file proposed stipulations, agreements, or other reports resulting from a prehearing conference on a date before the hearing.

(f) The administrative law judge shall set the hearing for a date and time most convenient to the parties concerned.

(g) The administrative law judge shall set dates in the complete petition calendar for the parties to file posthearing briefs and reply briefs.

(h) (1) For all petitions contested by an intervenor, the complete petition calendar shall require a final order and tariff to be published no
 later than 240 days from the date of petition filing established pursuant to Section 1268 if there is no rereferral under Section 1279.

(2) For all petitions that are either uncontested by an intervenor or a joint submission that is not subject to any further requests to intervene by a party opposed to the petition, the complete petition calendar shall require that an expedited hearing date is set and a final order and tariff are published no later than 120 days from the date of petition filing established pursuant to Section 1268 if there is no rereferral under Section 1279.

(i) This section does not prohibit an administrative law judge from revising by order the hearing date or other components of the complete petition calendar at the discretion of the administrative law judge
 in response to a motion by a party or upon stipulation of the parties at any time after the initial order setting the complete petition calendar.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1272.

(a) During the public hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge retains the discretion to direct additional briefing or presentation of evidence by the parties posthearing. All parties have the right to respond at the hearing and in writing posthearing to a direction by the administrative law judge for additional briefing or presentation of evidence, regardless of to which party the additional briefing or presentation of evidence are directed.

(b) During the public hearing on the petition, the executive director shall be in attendance and available to the administrative law judge. The administrative law judge retains the discretion to consult with the
 executive director in public during the public hearing. All parties have the right to respond at the hearing and in writing posthearing to a consultation by the administrative law judge with the executive director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1273.

(a) At the conclusion of the public hearing on the petition and until the issuance of the tentative order and tariff, the administrative law judge may submit bench interrogatories and discovery requests to a party or parties. All parties have the right to respond to posthearing bench interrogatories and discovery requests, regardless of to which party the interrogatories or discovery requests are directed.

(b) The administrative law judge may set consultations or develop bench interrogatories or discovery requests for the executive director. All parties may attend all posthearing bench consultations and respond independently and, in addition, all parties have the
 right to respond to posthearing bench interrogatories and discovery requests that are directed to the executive director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1274.

Except as otherwise permitted with respect to the executive director’s responses to bench requests pursuant to Section 1273, members of the board and board staff shall not engage in ex parte communications regarding the pilotage tariff, pilotage rates, or issues that are the subject of a pilotage tariff petition with any party, stakeholder, member of the public, or other board member during the period beginning with the request by the executive director for assignment of an administrative law judge until the time that any potential for a related board hearing on the petition has concluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Orders [1275. - 1279.]

1275.

(a) The administrative law judge shall issue a tentative order and tariff inclusive of the findings of law and findings of fact necessary to support the tentative order and tariff.

(b) The tentative order and tariff shall be based on the formulaic rate approach and factors described in Section 1251 and include specific findings with respect to each formula factor.

(c) The tentative order and tariff shall set both a publication date for the final order and tariff and an effective date for the tariff of no later than 30 days after the publication date if there is no further board action pursuant to Section 1278.

(d) All parties shall receive electronic service of the tentative order and tariff and included findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1276.

(a) Upon receipt of a tentative order and tariff from an administrative law judge, the executive director shall provide board members, parties, and the public with notice of the issuance of the tentative order and tariff and included findings, and the publication date and effective date established by the tentative order and tariff by publication on the board’s internet website, and to advise board members and the public of their right to request that the executive director agendize the tentative order and tariff at the next regular meeting of the board between the issuance of the tentative order and tariff and the publication date pursuant to this section.

(b) In the 10 calendar days following the notice of the issuance of the tentative order and tariff by the executive director pursuant to subdivision (a), board members, parties, and members of the public have the right to request that the tentative order and tariff be agendized for consideration at the next regular monthly meeting of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.

If no request for the tentative order and tariff to be agendized is received by the executive director within 10 calendar days of the notice provided pursuant to Section 1276, the tentative order and tariff are final as a matter of law. The executive director shall cause to be published a final order and tariff inclusive of findings on the publication date specified by the tentative order and tariff on the board’s internet website. The executive director shall further submit the final tariff to the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Regulatory Notice Register. If the effective date is not included in the tentative order and tariff or is defective for any reason, the final tariff shall be deemed to be effective upon
 publication in the California Regulatory Notice
 Register.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1278.

(a) If a request for the tentative order and tariff to be agendized is received by the executive director within 10 calendar days of the notice provided pursuant to Section 1276, the tentative order and tariff shall be agendized for the next regular monthly meeting of the board.

(b) (1) If the next regular monthly meeting of the board is 10 or more calendar days from the receipt of the request to agendize the tentative order and tariff, the board shall notice the hearing pursuant to Section 11125 of the Government Code.

(2) If the next regular meeting is less than 10 calendar days from
 the receipt of the request to agendize the tentative order and
 tariff, the board shall notice the hearing pursuant to Section 11125.3 of the Government Code.

(c) Upon consideration of the tentative order and tariff at the next regular monthly meeting of the board, the board shall hold a public hearing in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The executive director shall summarize and present the tentative order and tariff.

(2) Parties to the petition proceeding shall be provided with the opportunity to comment on the tentative order and tariff. All comments by the parties shall be recorded in board minutes and may include any of the following:

(A) A stipulation agreed to by all parties that
 includes a request for technical changes to the tentative order and tariff with a precise copy of the technical changes requested and a justification for each proposed technical change.

(B) A request by an individual party that includes a request for technical changes to the tentative order and tariff with a precise copy of the technical changes requested and a justification for each proposed technical change.

(C) A request by an individual party that includes a request for the tentative order and tariff to be rereferred to the administrative law judge for further proceedings pursuant to Section 1279, including the specific items and issues sought to be briefed and reviewed upon rereferral and a justification for each item and issue sought to be briefed and reviewed upon rereferral.

(3) The public shall be provided with the opportunity to comment on the tentative order and tariff and all public comments shall be recorded in board minutes.

(4) The Transportation Agency shall be provided with the opportunity to comment on the tentative order and tariff and all comments by the agency shall be recorded in board minutes.

(d) Upon conclusion of the public hearing, the members of the board shall be required to take one of the following actions:

(1) Accept the tentative order and tariff.

(2) Accept the tentative order and tariff as proposed to be revised pursuant to the technical change
 stipulations presented by the parties pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(3) Reject the tentative order and tariff, provided that the board agrees to a basis for rejecting the tentative order and tariff and
 the basis for the rejection is documented.

(4) Rerefer the tentative order and tariff back to the administrative law judge for further proceedings pursuant to Section 1279, provided that the board agrees to a basis for rereferring the tentative order and tariff as presented by a party as a request for a technical change pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or as a request for rereferral pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and the basis for rereferral is documented.

(5) Take no action.

(e) (1) If the board accepts the tentative order and tariff or takes no action pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (5) of subdivision (d),
 the tentative order and tariff are deemed to be final as a matter of law. The executive director shall cause to be published a final order and tariff inclusive of findings on the publication date specified by the tentative order and tariff or on an alternative date as set by the board. The executive director shall further submit the final tariff to the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Regulatory Notice Register with an effective date of 30 days after the board hearing.

(2) If the board rejects the tentative order and tariff pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), the petition is deemed rejected as a matter of law. The executive director shall cause to be published a formal notice of rejection on the board’s internet website inclusive of the documentation of the basis for rejection. The executive director shall
 further submit the formal notice of rejection to the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(3) If the board opts to rerefer the tentative order and tariff to the administrative law judge pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d), the executive director shall provide all copies of all hearing materials to the administrative law judge for the purpose of administering an additional hearing on the petition pursuant to Section 1279.

(f) The board action required by subdivision (d) shall be taken before the publication date set by the administrative law judge.

(g) For purposes of this section, a “technical change” is a change to the language of the tentative order and
 tariff that does not result in a change to, and is consistent with, the findings or conclusions of the tentative order and tariff as issued by the administrative law judge pursuant to Section 1275.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1279.

(a) If the board opts to rerefer a tentative order and tariff to the administrative law judge pursuant to Section 1278, the further review of the petition by the administrative law judge shall be conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of the board hearing materials from the executive director, the administrative law judge shall by order set a deadline for the parties to submit a proposed calendar for supplemental briefing.

(2) The calendar shall be limited to briefing on the basis of the existing evidence in the record and no additional discovery or data requests
 shall be allowed by the parties.

(3) The substantive scope of the briefing shall be limited to issues raised by the party requesting a rereferral before the board and affirmed by the board in its adopted basis for rereferral.

(c) The calendar set by the administrative law judge shall be to support a determination upon the briefing alone and no additional public hearing shall be scheduled.

(d) The calendar for briefing and for the issuance of a reviewed tentative order and tariff is to be determined by the administrative law judge.

(e) The administrative law judge has the discretion to issue a reviewed tentative order and tariff to the board. The reviewed tentative
 order and tariff may be revised as requested by a party.

(f) A reviewed tentative order and tariff issued under this section shall be consistent with the requirements of Section 1275.

(g) Upon receipt of a reviewed tentative order and tariff, the board shall proceed in a manner consistent with Sections 1276, 1277, and 1278, with the exception that the board shall not take any action on a reviewed tentative order pursuant to paragraph (2) or (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 1278.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Administrative Provisions [1280. - 1281.]

1280.

(a) The board shall authorize a pilot to establish a catastrophic event memorandum account and to record in that account the costs of maintaining, restoring, repairing, or replacing the provision of pilotage services to customers due to a catastrophic event.

(b) The costs, including capital costs, recorded in a catastrophic event memorandum account shall only be recovered through the catastrophic event surcharge following the submission of an application by an affected pilot, the board finding the reasonableness of the costs identified in a catastrophic event memorandum account, and approval by the board of a definitive and exact amount of costs authorized to
 recover. The board may adjust the total amount of costs to be recovered to reflect any associated savings to ongoing operations or other pilot capital costs as a result from the expense of pilot costs associated with those identified in a catastrophic event memorandum account.

(c) The board shall hold a proceeding in response to a pilot application to recover costs associated with catastrophic events, including a hearing conducted pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The catastrophic event surcharge shall only be billed on the first day of the fiscal quarter after final approval by the board of an application of an affected pilot, and upon a separate action by the board at a following
 meeting to set a reasonable time and rate of recovery recommended by the finance committee of the board. The finance committee recommendation shall take into consideration any impact that the catastrophic event may have had on pilot customers and may reduce or extend the terms of the surcharge imposition as appropriate.

(e) The moneys collected under a catastrophic event surcharge shall be used only to recover the costs approved in the pilot catastrophic event memorandum account in the manner established by the board.

(f) At the recommendation of the finance committee, the board may adjust the surcharge amount established pursuant to Section 1190.3 as necessary to efficiently administer the recovery of costs of the catastrophic event memorandum account, with adjustments to
 take effect only on the first day of the fiscal quarter following adjustment of the surcharge.

(g) Information regarding moneys remitted to an affected pilot and moneys collected from the surcharge pursuant to Section
 1190.3, as well as information regarding moneys spent as catastrophic event memorandum account costs, shall be made available to the board or its finance committee in a regular format upon request by the board or its finance committee. The information shall additionally be made available to the public upon request to the board.

(h) The board shall adopt, by regulation, the process for approving the recovery of catastrophic event costs, including, but not limited to, the form and information it shall require in an application for the recovery of costs related to a catastrophic event and the format for the catastrophic event memorandum account reports acceptable to the board.

(i) For purposes of this section, “catastrophic event surcharge” means the
 catastrophic event surcharge established pursuant to Section 1190.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1281.

Pilots may submit to the board annually a copy of an audit of the financial record of pilotage operations for the prior year. The pilot audited financial document shall be a public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. HARBORS AND PORTS [1690. - 3980.]



PART 1. PORT INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCING [1690. - 1719.]



  CHAPTER 1. Findings and Definitions [1690. - 1699.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings [1690. - 1690.]

1690.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The state has a compelling interest in the success of its ports and harbors because they provide significant economic benefit to the state in terms of jobs, personal income, business revenue, and taxes. It is the policy of the state that, because of that compelling interest, legislation in this area is a matter of statewide concern and is necessary to develop the harbors and ports of this state for the benefit of the people.

(b) Ports and harbors are the vital interface between water and land transportation for trade with the Pacific Rim countries and other trade. In this respect,
 the specific management of the state’s ports and harbors by specific harbor and port districts established pursuant to Division 8 (commencing with Section 5800) are of equal statewide concern and importance as the management of granted lands held in trust for the state by a local port or harbor district.

(c) Historically, California’s ports and harbors have been self-supporting. Most port and harbor districts do not levy or expend funds generated by local taxes, as most of their operations are funded directly through fees and other revenue the ports generate from their users or tenants, in addition to occasional state and federal grants.

(d) The report of the California Transportation Commission entitled “Improving Access to California’s Ports,” dated February 1990, found that eight hundred ninety-seven million dollars ($897,000,000) is needed for port access transportation
 projects. By December 2014, the “California Freight Mobility Plan” report of the Department of Transportation identified a comprehensive list of freight projects in the state, including port access transportation projects, with an estimated total cost of one hundred thirty-eight billion dollars ($138,000,000,000).

(e) In addition to port access transportation projects, there is a need for new harbor facilities and infrastructure investments that will enhance California’s competitiveness for international cargoes, grow employment, yield significant economic development, increase state and local tax revenues, and reduce impacts to environmental quality from goods movement.

(f) Because of limited revenues from port operations, shrinking federal and state funding and the increasing demand for those limited funds, ports and harbors are no longer able to finance projects of this
 magnitude without new funding mechanisms. One such mechanism that can be used to finance port and harbor development projects is the enhanced infrastructure financing district.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature to assist in the reduction of local borrowing costs, help accelerate the construction, repair, and maintenance of port capital improvements, and promote greater use of existing and new financial instruments and mechanisms.

(h) It is further the intent of the Legislature to assert the state’s plenary power over the financing of port and harbor infrastructure by harbor agencies as matters of statewide concern and to authorize the use of tax increment financing, as provided in Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, to support investment of tax revenues in port and harbor infrastructure.

(i) The Legislature empowers local legislative bodies with specific and exclusive delegated authority to manage the state’s ports and harbors by legislative grant and by establishment of special districts pursuant to this code. In addition, the Legislature delegates to public financing authorities the power to establish seaport infrastructure financing districts for the purpose of leveraging investment in support of the statewide interest in improving port and harbor infrastructure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 8.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1691. - 1699.]

1691.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1692.

“Authority” means a joint powers entity or nonprofit public benefit corporation created in accordance with Section 1700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1197, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1693.

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, commercial paper, or other evidences of indebtedness or lease, installment sale, or other agreements or certificates of participation therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.

“Harbor agency” means any state or local agency, city, county, city and county, harbor district, port district, harbor improvement district, river port district, small craft harbor district, or other public district, entity, board, commission, or agency that operates a port or harbor in the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.

“Infrastructure fund” means a port or harbor infrastructure fund established by an authority pursuant to Section 1700.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.

“Joint powers laws” means Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.

“Member” means any harbor agency that is party to an agreement establishing an authority pursuant to Section 1700.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.

(a) “Port or harbor infrastructure” means any of the following, if its primary or predominant use is of direct benefit to the port or harbor:

(1) Streets, roads, highways, bridges, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, tunnels, subways, alleyways, viaducts, pipelines, rail lines, or other facilities for the transportation or movement of people, vehicles, equipment, or goods.

(2) Piers, docks, wharves, slips, quays, platforms, decks, cranes, or other facilities for the mooring, docking, loading, or unloading of vessels.

(3) Lands, tidelands, submerged lands, easements, port access routes, channel
 improvements, rights-of-way, dredge disposal sites, safety zones, breakwaters, levees, bulkheads, or walls of rock or other material to protect property or traffic.

(4) Parking, warehouse, or storage facilities.

(5) Parks, recreation, or open space facilities.

(6) Remediation or any capital improvement that improves environmental quality.

(7) Water, wastewater, drainage, electric, or telecommunication systems or facilities.

(8) Buildings, structures, facilities, improvements, or equipment necessary or convenient to any of paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, or to the operation of a port or harbor.

(9) Public improvements
 authorized pursuant to the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), and the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) Any port or harbor infrastructure may be privately operated. Except for any port or harbor infrastructure financed or subsidized with public trust revenues, any privately owned port or harbor infrastructure may be eligible in whole or in part for financing or other support or subsidy from money deposited in the infrastructure fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1701.

(c) If a port or harbor infrastructure financed wholly or partly with public funds is privately owned and if the
 use for which the port or harbor infrastructure was originally constructed changes or is incompatible with the port authority’s master plan, the private owner shall pay the public agency the percentage of the full appreciated value of the port or harbor infrastructure that was originally financed with public funds.

(d) Any port or harbor infrastructure may be located within, partly within and partly outside, or outside the boundaries of any harbor agency.

(e) Any port or harbor infrastructure that has been purchased, constructed, expanded, improved, or rehabilitated by the expenditure or use of public trust revenues shall be held as an asset of the trust in a share proportionate to the investment of public trust revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 9.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1699.

“Seaport infrastructure financing district” means an enhanced infrastructure financing district that finances port or harbor infrastructure created in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1710) of this part and Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 10.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation and Powers of an Authority [1700. - 1706.]

1700.

(a) Any two or more harbor agencies may, pursuant to the joint powers law, establish an authority, separate from the parties to the agreement, for the purpose, in addition to any other purpose permitted under the joint powers law, of establishing an infrastructure fund and financing port or harbor infrastructure pursuant to this part.

(b) An authority may be formed as a nonprofit public benefit corporation subject to the nonprofit corporation law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), for the purpose of establishing an infrastructure fund and financing port or harbor infrastructure pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1197, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.

An authority established pursuant to Section 1700 shall deposit into an infrastructure fund established by the authority all of the following:

(a) Any federal, state, or private grants received by the authority directly or by assignment or other transfer from the state, any member, or any other public body.

(b) Any other money of, or received by, the authority, which the authority determines to deposit in the infrastructure fund.

(c) Any public trust revenues deposited into an infrastructure account shall continue to be public trust assets subject to Section 6306 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

An authority may establish one or more subaccounts within the infrastructure fund, and may treat each subaccount as separate and distinct. Money in the infrastructure fund may be invested in any instrument permitted by Section 53601 of the Government Code. However, any money in any subaccount which is separately pledged to secure or pay bonds may be invested in, or may be limited to investments in, any instrument permitted by the resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds. Any investment income earned on the investment of money in an infrastructure fund shall be credited to the infrastructure fund unless, and to the extent that, federal or state law or agreement, pursuant to which moneys were deposited into the fund, requires otherwise. Any income earned on the investment of money in any subaccount shall be credited to the subaccount unless, and to the extent that, the authority establishing the fund determines otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.

Subject to the terms and conditions determined by an authority that establishes an infrastructure fund, including, but not limited to, any terms and conditions related to interest rates, payment, prepayment, pledges, security, remedy for defaults, the funds in an infrastructure fund, or any subaccount therein, may be used for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To make loans to, or to enter into an installment sale or other agreement with, any member or other harbor agency for the purpose of financing or refinancing any port or harbor infrastructure.

(b) To purchase, refinance, or restructure bonds issued by any member or other harbor agency in whole or in part to finance or refinance any port or harbor infrastructure.

(c) To secure or guarantee, or to purchase, pay for, or reimburse any guaranty, insurance, or other credit enhancement of, any bonds issued by the authority, any member, or any harbor agency, if the bonds were issued in whole or in part to finance or refinance any port or harbor infrastructure.

(d) To pay the costs of administering the infrastructure fund or the authority, including any costs of issuance of bonds issued by the authority to finance or refinance port or harbor infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.

In addition to any purpose authorized under the joint powers law for which bonds may be issued, an authority may issue bonds in the manner set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to finance or refinance any port or harbor infrastructure or to make deposits into the infrastructure fund or any subaccount thereof, except that a nonprofit public benefit corporation may issue bonds only to the extent authorized by a joint powers agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1197, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.

Exclusively for purposes of securing the financing of port or harbor infrastructure, any harbor agency may borrow funds from, or otherwise secure financing through, an authority at the interest rate or rates, with the maturity date or dates, payment, pledge, security, default, remedy, and other terms and conditions specified in bonds of the harbor agency or obtain a loan, loan purchase, installment purchase, lease, or other agreement between the authority and the harbor agency. The harbor agency also may enter into any agreement for liquidity or credit enhancement that may be necessary or appropriate, as determined by the authority and consistent with other provisions of law, in connection with the borrowing or loan. This section provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for performing the acts authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.

(a) Before any public funds are allocated pursuant to this part for a privately owned port or harbor infrastructure, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1698, approval of the Treasurer is required.

(b) Each authority shall submit an annual report regarding receipts and expenditures from the infrastructure fund and all financing activities to the Controller and to the California Debt Advisory Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1235, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Seaport Infrastructure Financing Districts  [1710. - 1719.]

1710.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In addition to the findings and declarations in Section 53398.50 of the Government Code, the ability to capture property tax increment revenues to finance needed seaport and harbor infrastructure projects will provide direct benefits to the state. When harbor agencies are better funded to further the objectives of the state, its seaports and harbors, and the public trust and enjoyment of those trust lands by the people of the state, local economies and the local environment will also be improved.

(b) A seaport or harbor or its operation frequently generates large local tax benefits directly as a
 result of the possessory interest taxes paid on the value of leased port and harbor real property.

(c) The tax increment increases in possessory interest taxes that will result from the improvement of seaport and harbor infrastructure should be captured, whenever possible, and reinvested to support the state’s significant interest in the successful operation of its seaports and harbors.

(d) The unique nature of the state’s public seaports and harbors, including the nature of the statewide interest in their operations, requires special rules if these ports and harbors are to be allowed to participate in a seaport infrastructure financing district.

(e) The seaport infrastructure financing district is specifically developed to include publicly owned property, to improve that public property, and to achieve the public
 goals of improving the state’s waterborne commerce, enhancing economic prosperity, and financing the costs of environmental mitigation and improvement.

(f) This chapter is intended to maintain and enforce the state’s retained rights, statewide interests, obligations and sovereign duties in its seaports, harbors, and tidelands, including protecting these same assets from local control or excise, while simultaneously creating an opportunity for public financing authorities to participate in facilitating investment in the state’s public seaport infrastructure and finance projects that will have the anticipated effect of not only providing statewide benefits, but also local benefits such as boosting local employment, local secondary economic development, local environmental improvement, and increased local tax revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1711.

As used in this chapter, “public financing authority” has the same meaning as provided in Section 53398.51 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1712.

When designated by the legislative body pursuant to Section 53398.62 of the Government Code, the harbor agency shall prepare a proposed infrastructure financing plan, as provided in Section 53398.63 of the Government Code, for a seaport infrastructure financing district covering a port or harbor infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1713.

(a) Upon receipt of a resolution from the public financing authority promulgated under subdivision (a) of Section 53398.80.5 of the Government Code, the harbor agency shall have 60 days to consider the proposal. During this time, the harbor agency’s governing body shall act at a duly noticed meeting to either vote to give preliminary approval of the proposal, subject to the provisions of this section, or disapprove the proposal and return it to the public financing authority.

(b) A harbor agency may give preliminary approval under this section only if it makes all of the following affirmative findings:

(1) The harbor agency has prepared an
 infrastructure financing plan pursuant to Section 1712.

(2) The improvements to the harbor agency’s property to be financed through the proceeds of a seaport infrastructure financing district are solely for the support of port or harbor infrastructure.

(3) All publicly owned property that is leased to private parties within the boundaries of the seaport infrastructure financing district has been reported by the harbor agency to the local county assessor to facilitate possessory interest taxation.
